Utah statutes.
41-1a-702.   Endorsement of assignment and warranty of title -- Co-owners.

(1) (a)  To transfer a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor the owner shall endorse the certificate of title issued for the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor in the space for assignment and warranty of title.

(b)  The endorsement and assignment shall include a statement of all liens or encumbrances on the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.

(c)  Upon the endorsement and assignment of a certificate of title, the same certificate of title may not be reendorsed and reassigned to a new owner except as provided in Section 41-1a-705.

(2) (a)  If a title certificate reflects the names of two or more people as co-owners in the alternative by use of the word "or" or "and/or," each co-owner is considered to have granted the other co-owners the absolute right to endorse and deliver title and to dispose of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.

(b)  If the title certificate reflects the names of two or more people as co-owners in the conjunctive by use of the word "and," or the title does not reflect any alternative or conjunctive word, the endorsement of each co-owner is required to transfer title to the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.

(3)  The owner shall deliver the certificate of title containing the odometer disclosure statement required under Section 41-1a-902 and the certificate of registration to the purchaser or transferee at the time of, or within 48 hours after delivering the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, as applicable, except as provided for under Sections 41-3-301, 41-1a-519, and 41-1a-709.

